Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3805
Prepaid dental service plan; coverage;
contract; certificate; requirements;
prohibited acts.

(1) A prepaid dental service
plan may be offered on an individual or group basis. Each person covered under
a group contract shall be issued a certificate of coverage.

(2) No contract or certificate for dental service may be issued in this
state unless a copy of the form has been filed with and approved by the director.

(3) No prepaid dental
service plan offered in this state shall limit any fees charged for services
that are not covered by the plan.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB813, § 2.